Maryland, session 2025, SB0759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–207.
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(mm) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Correctional officer” means an individual who:
1. was employed in:
A. a State correctional facility, as defined in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article;
B. a local correctional facility, as defined in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article;
C. a juvenile facility included in § 9–226 of the Human
Services Article; or
D. a facility of the United States that is equivalent to a State
or local correctional facility or a juvenile facility included in § 9–226 of the Human Services
Article; and
2. is eligible to receive retirement income attributable to the
individual’s employment under item 1 of this subparagraph.
(iii) “Emergency services personnel” means emergency medical
technicians [or], paramedics, OR 9–1–1 SPECIALISTS.
(iv) “Employee retirement system” has the meaning stated under §
10–209(a) of this subtitle.
(V) “9–1–1 SPECIALIST” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–262(A) OF THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 759 3
[(v)] (VI) “Public safety employee” means an individual who is a
retired correctional officer, law enforcement officer, or fire, rescue, or emergency services
personnel of the United States, the State, or a political subdivision of the State.
(2) The subtraction under subsection (a) of this section includes the first
$15,000 of income from an employee retirement system that is attributable to service as a
public safety employee, if the income is received by an individual who is at least 55 years
old on the last day of the taxable year.
Article – Tax – Property
9–262.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “9–1–1 specialist” means an employee of a county public safety
answering point, or an employee working in a county safety answering point, whose duties
and responsibilities include:
(i) receiving and processing 9–1–1 requests for emergency
assistance;
(ii) other support functions directly related to 9–1–1 requests for
emergency assistance; or
(iii) dispatching law enforcement officers, fire rescue services,
emergency medical services, and other public safety services to the scene of an emergency.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.